Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Administration and Management of the Assets of the Fund

47-14-20.
Creation of the Board of Commissioners of the Superior Court Clerks’ Retirement Fund of Georgia; membership of the board; quorum; compensation and expenses.

There is created the Board of Commissioners of the Superior Court Clerks’ Retirement Fund of Georgia. The board shall consist of seven members as follows:

The Governor or the Governor’s designee;

An appointee of the Governor who is not the Attorney General; and

Five clerks who shall be members of the fund, provided that at least one but not more than two of such clerks shall be retired clerks receiving retirement benefits pursuant to this chapter.

The members of the board provided for by paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed by the Governor. The first such members shall be appointed by the Governor to take office on July 1, 1984, for initial terms as follows: Two such members shall be appointed for terms of one year; two such members shall be appointed for terms of two years; and one such member shall be appointed for a term of one year. Thereafter, the Governor shall appoint successors upon the expiration of the respective terms of office for terms of three years. All such members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Such members shall be eligible for reappointment to successive terms of office as members of the board.

The board shall elect a chairperson from the clerks serving as members of the board who actively hold office as clerks. The term of the chairperson shall be established by rules of the board.

If a vacancy occurs in the membership of the board appointed pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, the remaining members of the board shall elect a person meeting the qualifications specified by paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section to fill such vacancy for the unexpired portion of the term.

Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

All of the members of the board shall serve without pay, but they shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses in attending meetings of the board and performing the duties required of them as members of the board.

The Superior Court Clerks’ Group of the County Officers’ Association of Georgia shall be authorized to submit the names of nominees for each position on the board appointed by the Governor pursuant to this Code section. The Governor may consider the nominees made by said Superior Court Clerks’ Group in making such appointments, but it is specifically provided that all such appointments shall be at the sole discretion of the Governor, and the Governor shall not be required to make any appointments from nominees made by said Superior Court Clerks’ Group.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 238, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 330, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 407, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1547, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 929, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 470, §§ 2, 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1984, p. 929, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The positions of membership on the Board of Commissioners of the Superior Court Clerks’ Retirement Fund, except for the Governor and the Attorney General, existing on June 30, 1984, shall stand abolished on July 1, 1984.”

Ga. L. 1984, p. 929, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor [March 28, 1984] or upon its otherwise becoming law for the administrative purpose of allowing the Governor to consider appointments pursuant to quoted Code Section 47-14-20 of Section 1 of this Act. This Act shall become effective for all purposes on July 1, 1984.”

47-14-21.
Creation of office of secretary-treasurer; selection, compensation, and powers and duties; periodic reports of moneys in hand, receipts, and expenditures; performance bond.

There is created the office of secretary-treasurer of the Superior Court Clerks’ Retirement Fund of Georgia. The secretary-treasurer shall be selected and appointed by the board and shall serve at the pleasure of the board. His compensation shall be fixed by the board. He shall have such power and authority as may be given him by the board and shall perform such duties and services as the board may desire.

The secretary-treasurer shall make quarterly reports to the board showing the total amount of money in his hands at the time such report is made and also showing a full accounting of receipts and expenditures since his last quarterly report.

The secretary-treasurer shall give a good and sufficient surety bond in an amount to be determined by the board. The bond shall be made payable to the board and shall be contingent upon the proper and faithful performance of his duties as secretary-treasurer.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 238, §§ 2, 12; Ga. L. 1971, p. 321, § 1.

47-14-22.
Powers and duties of the board generally.

The board shall have the power and duty to:

Provide for the collection of all moneys in connection with this chapter;

Provide for the payment of all administrative expenses;

Hear and decide all applications for retirement benefits under this chapter;

Provide for the payment of all retirement benefits that may be determined to be due under the rules and regulations as adopted by the board;

Make all necessary rules and regulations not inconsistent with the laws of this state for its government and for the government of the employees who are employed to administer this chapter;

Determine and fix rules of eligibility of persons to receive retirement benefits under this chapter;

Make provisions for refunds and repayments to persons who may be entitled to receive them;

Keep records of all its meetings;

Subject to the terms and limitations of this Code section, the board is authorized to adopt from time to time a method or methods of providing for increases in the maximum monthly retirement benefit payable under Article 5 of this chapter for persons retiring under this chapter. Such method shall be based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant. Any such increase may be uniform or may vary in accordance with the time of retirement, length of service, age, nature of the retirement, or such other factors as the board shall determine.

No increase granted pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall exceed 3 percent of the maximum monthly retirement benefit then in effect. Thereafter, such increases may become effective as of January 1 and July 1 of each year; provided, however, that no such increase shall exceed 1 1/2 percent of the maximum monthly retirement benefit then in effect.

No increase pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall become effective within six months of the effective date of any increase in the maximum retirement benefit granted by the General Assembly pursuant to Code Section 47-14-70; and

Subject to the terms and limitations of this Code section, the board is authorized to provide for a one-time increase in the maximum monthly retirement benefit payable under Article 5 of this chapter for persons retired or retiring under this chapter. Such increase shall be based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant.

Such increase may be uniform or may vary in accordance with the time of retirement, length of service, age, nature of the retirement, or such other factors as the board shall determine.

No increase granted pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall exceed 4 percent of the maximum monthly retirement benefit then in effect. Such increase shall be in addition to any other increase in such benefit provided by this chapter.

The board shall have all other powers necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 238, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 158, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1313, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 62, § 1/SB 104.

47-14-23.
Special account for funds; investment powers of board.

The board shall have control of the funds provided for in this chapter; and all funds received by the board shall be deposited in a special account to the credit of the Superior Court Clerks’ Retirement Fund of Georgia. Benefits under this chapter and all administrative expenses shall be paid from such funds. The board shall have authority to expend the funds in accordance with this chapter.

The board of commissioners shall have full power to invest and reinvest the assets of the fund and to purchase, hold, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any securities and other investments in which assets of the fund have been invested, any proceeds of any investments, and any money belonging to the fund; provided, however, that such power shall be subject to all terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title, the “Public Retirement Systems Investment Authority Law.”

The board is authorized to employ agents, including, but not limited to, banks or trust departments thereof, and to enter into contracts with such agents for their services as investment advisers and counselors, in making recommendations for investments, and in making investments if the board so authorizes.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 238, § 3; Ga. L. 1963, p. 263, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1998, p. 158, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 10; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, §§ 65, 66/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “board of commissioners” for “board of trustees” near the beginning of subsection (b) and substituted “advisers” for “advisors” in the middle of subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-14-24.
Gifts, grants, and bequests.

The board, by gift, grant, or bequest, may take any money, real or personal property, or any other thing of value and may hold or invest the same for the uses and purposes of the fund in accordance with this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 238, § 6.

47-14-25.
Duty of board to keep records; presentation of annual financial statement to Clerks’ Group of the County Officers’ Association of Georgia.

The board shall keep permanent records of retirement benefits granted and shall keep proper records and books concerning the operation of the board. Each year the board shall present an annual financial statement of the fund at the annual meeting of the Clerks’ Group of the County Officers’ Association of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 238, § 5.

47-14-26.
Duty of the state auditor to make an annual audit and report; audit upon request of the board or the Governor; contents of annual report.

The state auditor is authorized and directed to make an annual audit of the acts and doings of the board and to make a complete report of that audit to the General Assembly. The state auditor shall not be required to distribute copies of the report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the report in the manner which he or she deems to be most effective and efficient. The report shall disclose all moneys received by the board and all its expenditures, including administrative expenses and payments made as annuities and benefits. The state auditor shall also make an audit of the affairs of the board at any time when requested by a majority of the board or the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 238, § 15; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 34/SB 49.